Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.400

Consolidation.

Two or more contiguous cities located in the same or different counties may consolidate into one city by proceedings in conformity with the provisions of this chapter. When cities are separated by water and/or tide or shore lands they shall be deemed contiguous for all the purposes of this chapter and, upon a consolidation of such cities under the provisions of this chapter, any such intervening water and/or tide or shore lands shall become a part of the consolidated city. The consolidated city shall become a noncharter code city operating under Title 35A RCW.

[ 1985 c 281 s 3.]